apertium-olr.olr.dix
	<pardef n="n_*jo-склон_n">
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ема</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ема</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>емъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ихъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*jo-склон_n_(ѥ)">
      <e><p><l>ѥ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѥ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѥма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѧ</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѥма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѥмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ѣ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ихъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*u-склон_m">
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ови</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ове</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*i-склон_f">
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ию</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ию</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ию</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ии</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*i-склон_m">
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ию</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ию</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>иѥ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ии</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*C-склон_m_(ен)">
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ене</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ени</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ень</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еньмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ене</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ени</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еноу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еньма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ени</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еньма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еноу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>ене</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>енъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еньмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ени</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еньми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>еньхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="n_*C-склон_m">
      <e><p><l>ь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>нь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ньмь</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>не</l><r><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьма</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оу</l><r><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьмъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьми</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ьхъ</l><r><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="аблань"><p><l>аблан</l><r>аблань</r></p><par n="n_*i-склон_f"/></e>
	<e lm="абрѣдиѥ"><p><l>абрѣди</l><r>абрѣдиѥ</r></p><par n="n_*jo-склон_n_(ѥ)"/></e>
	<e lm="абрѣдьѥ"><p><l>абрѣдь</l><r>абрѣдьѥ</r></p><par n="n_*jo-склон_n_(ѥ)"/></e>
